California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [70010. - 70014.]

70010.

It shall be the purpose of the Marin County Transit District to develop, finance, organize, and provide local Marin County transit service in a manner consistent with an overall San Francisco Bay Area regional transit system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

70011.

The Marin County Transit District may be created as provided in this part and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70012.

Except as otherwise provided in this part elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70013.

Except as otherwise provided in this part all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70014.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under the provisions of this part, except in the single instance provided in Section 70243, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimilies of such signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [70020. - 70055.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [70020. - 70022.]

70020.

The County of Marin may organize and incorporate as the Marin County Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70021.

The request for the formation of the Marin County Transit District may be made by resolution or by petition as set out in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70022.

The district may include incorporated or unincorporated territory within the County of Marin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Request by Resolution [70025. - 70026.]

70025.

The Board of Supervisors of the County of Marin may pass a resolution declaring that in its opinion public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of the Marin County Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70026.

The resolution may state the transit facilities proposed to be first acquired, but failure to acquire such transit facilities shall not affect the validity of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Request by Petition [70030. - 70033.]

70030.

Instead of a resolution, a petition may be presented to the board of supervisors signed by voters within Marin County equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast at the last general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70031.

The petition shall contain substantially the same declarations and statements required to be contained in the resolution adopted by the board of supervisors under this chapter and declare that, in the opinion of the petitioners, public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of the transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70032.

The petition may be on separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated it certifying that each name signed thereto is a true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70033.

The County Elections Official of the County of Marin shall compare the signatures to the petition with the affidavits of registration and certify to their sufficiency or insufficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [70035. - 70044.]

70035.

Upon adoption of the resolution or of a sufficient petition, the board of supervisors shall hold a hearing on the question of forming a Marin County Transit District. All interested persons shall be given an opportunity to express their views at the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70036.

The board of supervisors shall have the power to exclude areas which in the board’s determination would not receive reasonable benefit from inclusion in the district. Incorporated areas shall not be divided but shall be as a whole either included or excluded from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70037.

After the conclusion of the hearing, the board of supervisors shall in case of initiation by petition and may in case of initiation by resolution call an election within the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the proposed district will be created and established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70038.

The board of supervisors shall publish notice of the election within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70039.

The notice shall state the name of the proposed district, and describe the boundaries thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70040.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following: Shall the “Marin County Transit District” be created and established?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70041.

No person shall be entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the territory included in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70042.

The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election, and be consolidated therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70043.

The board of supervisors shall meet on the Tuesday next succeeding the day of the election and canvass the returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70044.

The board of supervisors shall make all provisions for the holding of the election throughout the district as proposed, and the cost of said election shall be a charge against the general funds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Establishment of the District [70050. - 70050.]

70050.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote in favor of the creation and establishment of the district, the board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the result of the election to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, from and after which the establishment of the district shall be deemed complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contest of Incorporation [70055. - 70055.]

70055.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of the election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of the district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of incorporation is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of filing the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State, otherwise the incorporation and the legal existence of the district shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of District [70060. - 70095.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [70060. - 70061.]

70060.

The governing body of the district shall consist of the members of the board of supervisors and two members, who shall be a mayor or councilman of a city, selected by the city selection committee which selects the city members of the local agency formation commission in the county pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5, of the Government Code. The chairman of the board of supervisors shall be the chairman of the board of directors of the district. The county auditor shall be ex officio auditor of the district, the county tax collector-treasurer shall be ex officio tax collector-treasurer of the district and the county
 clerk shall be the ex officio clerk of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1956.)
-------------------------------------------

70061.

The city members of the governing body of the district shall serve for terms of two years commencing on the first Monday of January in each even-numbered year, and until their successors are selected and qualified. If a city member ceases to be a mayor or councilman during his term, his membership on the governing board shall thereafter be considered vacant.

The city selection committee shall meet at the call of the chairman of the governing body, or at the request of 60 percent of the members of the committee, to fill vacancies and make selections for prospective terms, on the governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Directors [70070. - 70079.]

70070.

The chairman is the presiding officer of the board and he shall vote on the propositions passed upon by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70071.

The first meeting of the board shall be held within 10 days after the board of supervisors certifies the results of the election to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 70050. The board may make its own rules of procedure and determine the place and time of its meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70072.

The board shall select one of its members vice chairman, who shall preside in the absence of its chairman. The board shall provide for and select such officers as it deems necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70073.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this part shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70074.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70075.

The board may either operate the transit system itself or a part thereof or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation to operate all or part of the transit system for the district or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation for the improvement in transit services, facilities, equipment or operations being operated and conducted by said agency or corporation in, and, or, out of, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70076.

Marin County Ordinance 617 (Merit System Ordinance) as amended or hereafter amended shall be applicable to all personnel of the district, except to the extent the provisions of such ordinance are in conflict with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 70120) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70077.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or services which cannot satisfactorily be performed by the regular employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70078.

The auditor shall provide the board with an annual audit of all books and accounts of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70079.

Payment of demands against the district and disbursement of district funds shall be in the manner provided for demands against a county and disbursements of funds of a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings and Legislation [70085. - 70089.]

70085.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in a manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70086.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70087.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings and board members shall be allowed necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in performance of duties authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70088.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution or ordinance. No ordinance, resolution or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors. District ordinances shall be adopted in the same manner as provided for adoption of ordinances by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70089.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows: “Be it ordained by the board of directors of the Marin County Transit District.” All ordinances shall be signed by the chairman or vice chairman of the board and attested by the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Officers [70095. - 70095.]

70095.

The board may appoint and fix the salary of a general manager who shall have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of the facilities of the district, and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Labor Provisions [70120. - 70129.]

70120.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection. It is declared to be in the public interest that the district shall not express any preference for one union over another.
 Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, the district, upon determining as provided in Section 70122 that the labor organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall enter into a written contract with the accredited representative of the employees governing wages, salaries, hours and working conditions. In case of a dispute over wages, salaries, hours or working conditions, which is not resolved by negotiations in good faith between the district and the labor organization, upon the request of either, the district and the labor organization may submit the dispute to the decision of the majority of an arbitration board, and the decision of the majority of the arbitration board shall be final. The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district, and two representatives of the labor
 organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of the fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the district have stricken four names, shall be designated as the arbitrator. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties. The expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties. Each party shall bear his or her own costs.

In the event the board and the representatives of the employees do not agree to submit the dispute to an arbitration board as herein provided, the California State Mediation and
 Conciliation Service may be notified by either party that a dispute exists and that there is no agreement to arbitrate. The service shall determine whether or not the dispute may be resolved by the parties and, if not, the issues concerning which the dispute exists. Upon the determination, the service shall certify its findings to the Governor who shall, within 10 days of receipt of certification appoint a fact finding commission consisting of three persons which shall immediately convene and inquire into and investigate the issues involved in the dispute. The commission shall report to the Governor within 30 days of the date of its creation.

After the creation of the commission and for 30 days after the commission has made its report to the Governor, no change, except by mutual agreement, shall be made by the parties to the controversy in the conditions out of which the dispute arose and service to the public shall be provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 126.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

70121.

(a) A contract or agreement shall not be made, or assumed, with any labor organization, association, group, or individual that denies membership to, or in any manner discriminates against, any employee on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence. 

(b) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

70122.

If there is a question whether a labor organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the State Conciliation Service for disposition. The State Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing after due notice to all interested parties and shall thereupon determine the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining. In making such determination and in establishing rules and regulations governing petitions, the conduct of hearings and elections, the State Conciliation Service shall be guided by relevant federal law and administrative practice, developed under the
 Labor-Management Relations Act, 1947, as presently amended.

The State Conciliation Service shall provide for an election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties. Any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later; provided, that no collective bargaining agreement shall be construed to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70123.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, the district shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts. To the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such acquired public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination, subject to all the rights and benefits of this part, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, vacation and pension credits in accordance with the records and labor agreements of the acquired public utility.
 Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system or other benefits established by that public utility shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of his wages, seniority, pension, vacation or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

The district may extend the benefits of this section to officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70124.

The district shall not acquire any existing system or part thereof whether by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, nor shall the district dispose of or lease any transit system or part thereof, nor merge, consolidate or coordinate any transit system or part thereof, or reduce or limit the lines or service of any existing system or of its system, or terminate any lease arrangement or management contract, unless it shall first have made adequate provision for any employees who are or may be displaced. The terms and conditions of such provision shall be a proper subject of collective bargaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70125.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Government Code, employees of this district may authorize and, upon that authorization, the district may make deductions from their wages and salaries as follows:

(a) Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments. 

(b) For the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension or retirement plan.

(c) For any purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------

70126.

The obligation of the district to bargain in good faith with a duly designated or certified labor organization and to execute a written collective bargaining agreement with such labor organization covering the wages, hours and working conditions of the employees represented by such labor organization in an appropriate unit, and to comply with the terms thereof shall not be limited or restricted by the provisions of the Government Code or other laws or statutes and the obligation of the district to bargain collectively shall extend to all subjects of collective bargaining which are or may be proper subjects of collective bargaining with a private employer, including
 retroactive provisions. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Code or other laws or statutes, the district shall make deductions from wages and salaries of its employees upon receipt of authorization therefor for the payment of union dues, fees or assessments, for the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension plan or for any other purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer, where such deductions are pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70127.

The district may provide for a retirement system; provided, that the adoption, terms and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district represented by a labor organization in accordance with this section shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between such labor organization and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70128.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under Title II of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70129.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation disability and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [70130. - 70130.]

70130.

The Marin County Employees Retirement System and the laws relating thereto or as hereafter amended shall be applicable to the officers and employees of the district, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 70120) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [70160. - 70223.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [70160. - 70162.]

70160.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70161.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70162.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district in exercising such power shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction or relocation of any structure, railway, mains, pipes, conduits, cables or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [70165. - 70166.]

70165.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70166.

No officer or employee of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [70175. - 70176.]

70175.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70176.

Exercise of the powers provided under Section 70175 shall be undertaken in the same manner and pursuant to the same procedures as in the exercise of like powers by the County of Marin, except as may otherwise be expressly provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [70180. - 70187.]

70180.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the district underground, upon or above the ground and under, upon or over public streets or other public ways, or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons or vehicles thereto and may acquire any interest in or rights to the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided that:

(a) Installations in
 state freeways shall be subject to the approval of the State Department of Public Works and installations in other state highways shall be subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670), Chapter 3, Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) Installations in city streets, parks, or other property devoted to municipal use, shall be subject to the approval of the city council having jurisdiction thereof.

The district may acquire, contract and negotiate for the services of any and all employees of any public or private agency or corporation operating transit facilities within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70181.

The district may without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may without limitation by any other provisions of this part enter into any contracts and cooperation with and accept cooperation from the State, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such transit
 facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70183.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm or private corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70184.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the State, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the State, and to install adequate bus stops, including the painting of curbs, subject to the governing body in charge of such streets, highways, stream, watercourse or lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70185.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any city, public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within, or without, the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70186.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70187.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to the operation of buses and to the rules and regulations prescribed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [70200. - 70201.]

70200.

The district shall have the power to obtain temporary transfers of funds in accordance with the last paragraph of Section 31, Article IV of the State Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70201.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this State, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, this State, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this State in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Property Taxation [70210. - 70220.]

70210.

The district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose subject to a maximum limit of five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70210.5.

The maximum tax rate set forth in Section 70210 may be increased to an amount approved by a majority of the electors of the district voting at a special election called for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

70211.

If, in the opinion of the board, the transit operation revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70212.

The board shall, in addition to the general tax levy as set forth in Section 70210, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax shall be levied and
 collected annually at the time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

70213.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70214.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of the county and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county and shall take such assessments as the basis for district taxation and have its taxes collected by the tax collector of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)